Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2970
Standards of conduct and liability.

(1) A director shall discharge his or her duties as a director, including his or her duties as a member of a committee:

(a) In good faith;

(b) With the care an ordinarily prudent person in a like position would exercise under similar circumstances; and

(c) In a manner he or she reasonably believes to be in the best interests of the limited cooperative association.

(2) In discharging his or her duties, a director shall be entitled to rely on information, opinions, reports, or statements, including financial statements and other financial data, if prepared or presented by:

(a) One or more officers or employees of the limited cooperative association whom the director reasonably believes to be reliable and competent in the matters presented;

(b) Legal counsel, public accountants, or other persons as to matters the director reasonably believes are within the person's professional or expert competence; or

(c) A committee of the board of directors of which he or she is not a member, if the director reasonably believes the committee merits confidence.

(3) A director shall not be considered to be acting in good faith if he or she has knowledge concerning the matter in question that makes reliance otherwise permitted by subsection (2) of this section unwarranted.

(4) A director shall not be liable for any action taken as a director or any failure to take any action if he or she performed the duties of his or her office in compliance with this section.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 70;

Laws 2008, LB706, § 1.